Maryland, session 2025, HB1514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1514*

HOUSE BILL 1514
19–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) “Secretary”, unless the context requires otherwise, means the Secretary of
State Police.
(k) “Security guard” means an individual who, regardless of whether the
individual is described as a security guard, watchman, or private patrolman or by other
title:
(1) (i) is an employee of a security guard agency; and
(ii) provides security guard services to another person on behalf of
the security guard agency; or
(2) (i) is an employee of a security guard employer; and
(ii) provides security guard services to the security guard employer.
(m) (1) “Security guard employer” means a person who employs security
guards only to provide security guard services to the person.
(2) “Security guard employer” does not include:
(I) a security guard agency;
(II) A VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR, AS DEFINED UNDER §
9–1A–01 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; OR
(III) A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE, AS DEFINED
UNDER § 9–1E–01 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
19–201.
Subject to the provisions of this title, the Secretary is responsible for the licensing of
security guard agencies and the regulation of those persons who provide security guard
services in the State.
19–401.
(c) Except as provided under subsection (d) of this section, a security guard
employer may employ a security guard to provide security guard services only if the
individual is certified by the Secretary as a security guard.

HOUSE BILL 1514 3
Article – State Government
9–1A–14.
(a) Unless an individual holds a valid video lottery employee license or temporary
video lottery employee license issued by the Commission, the individual may not be
employed by a video lottery operation licensee as a video lottery employee.
(b) Before issuance of a video lottery employee license, an applicant shall provide
sufficient information, documentation, and assurances that the Commission may require.
9–1E–03.
(a) (1) Unless the context requires otherwise, the requirements under §§
9–1A–04, 9–1A–06, 9–1A–07, 9–1A–08, 9–1A–12, 9–1A–14, 9–1A–18, 9–1A–19, 9–1A–20,
and 9–1A–25 of this title apply to the authority, duties, and responsibilities of the
Commission, a sports wagering licensee, and an employee or a contractor of a sports
wagering licensee under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.